Hawaii statutes.
[§30-3] Expenditures authorized;
limitations. (a) The comptroller shall provide, upon request, to each
governor-elect, for use in connection with the governor-elect's preparations
for the assumption of official duties as governor, necessary services and
facilities, including:

(1) Suitable office space appropriately equipped with
furniture, furnishings, office machines and equipment, and office supplies as
determined by the comptroller after consultation with the governor-elect,
within the state capitol complex;

(2) Payment of the compensation of members of office
staffs designated by the governor-elect at rates determined by the
governor-elect; provided that any employee of any agency of the state
government may be detailed to such staffs on a reimbursable or nonreimbursable
basis; and while so detailed such employee shall be responsible only to the
governor-elect for the performance of the employee's duties; and provided that
any employee so detailed shall continue to receive the compensation provided pursuant
to law for the employee's regular employment, and shall retain the rights and
privileges of such employment without interruption. Notwithstanding any other
law to the contrary, persons receiving compensation as members of office staffs
under this paragraph, other than those detailed from agencies, shall not be
held or considered to be employees of the state government except for purposes
of the public employees retirement system;

(3) Payment of expenses for the procurement of
services of experts or consultants or organizations thereof for the
governor-elect at rates not to exceed $100 per diem for individuals;

(4) Payment of travel expenses and subsistence
allowances, not to exceed that authorized for other state employees, including
rental by the state government of hired motor vehicles, found necessary by the
governor-elect, as authorized for persons employed intermittently or for
persons serving without compensation, as may be appropriate;

(5) Communication services found necessary by the
governor-elect;

(6) Payment of expenses for necessary printing and
binding.

Each governor-elect shall be entitled to conveyance
of all mail, including airmail, sent by the governor-elect in connection with
the governor-elect's preparations for the assumption of official duties as
governor.

(b) The comptroller shall expend no funds for
the provision of services and facilities under this chapter in connection with
any obligations incurred by the governor-elect before the day following the
date of the general elections.

(c) In the case where the governor-elect is
the incumbent governor, there shall be no expenditures of funds for the
provision of services and facilities to such incumbent under this chapter, and
any funds appropriated for such purposes shall be returned to the general fund
of the State. [L 1972, c 126, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next